South Dakota, session 2026, SB156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
3 Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 40-1:
4 An individual who commits the offense provided for in § 40-1-2.4 in an especially
5 depraved, heinous, sadistic, or wicked manner is guilty of a Class 4 felony.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.